Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.036] SCHOOL SAFETY PLANS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin School Safety Center. new text end new text begin (a) The School Safety Center must: new text end new text begin (1) develop an evidence-based model school safety plan for use by school boards; new text end new text begin (2) develop criteria for determining whether a school safety plan is evidence-based; new text end new text begin (3) review local school safety plans and notify school boards whether their school safety plans meet the requirements of this section; new text end new text begin (4) assess whether school facility improvements intended to improve school safety are evidence-based; new text end new text begin (5) administer grants for implementing evidence-based school safety plans, to the extent grant money is available; and new text end new text begin (6) prepare a report that identifies the schools that have adopted an evidence-based school safety plan and post the report on the Department of Public Safety's publicly facing website. The School Safety Center must submit the report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety and kindergarten through grade 12 education. The School Safety Center must update the report by December 1, 2028, and every two years thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) The School Safety Center may provide consulting services to schools serving students in kindergarten through grade 12 to develop, improve, or implement an evidence-based school safety plan. new text end new text begin (c) To implement the requirements of this section, the School Safety Center must employ at least two school mental health professionals. Each mental health professional must be a licensed school psychologist, licensed school social worker, or licensed school counselor. The School Safety Center may also consult with the comprehensive school mental health services lead at the Department of Education under section 127A.215. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Model plan. new text end new text begin (a) The School Safety Center at the Department of Public Safety, in consultation with the Department of Education, must maintain and make available to school boards and charter schools an evidence-based model school safety plan to prevent human-caused safety incidents. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, an activity, strategy, or intervention is "evidence-based" if it: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrates a statistically significant effect on improving student outcomes or other relevant outcomes based on: new text end new text begin (i) strong evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented experimental study; new text end new text begin (ii) moderate evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study; or new text end new text begin (iii) promising evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias; or new text end new text begin (2)(i) demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive evaluation that the activity, strategy, or intervention is likely to improve student outcomes or other relevant outcomes; and new text end new text begin (ii) includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the activity, strategy, or intervention. new text end new text begin (c) The School Safety Center must post the model plan on its website no later than September 1, 2026. The School Safety Center may make available to school boards evidence-based school safety plans developed by third parties. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Local school safety plan. new text end new text begin (a) A school board of a district or charter school must adopt an evidence-based school safety plan to prevent human-caused safety incidents that meets the minimum requirements of the model plan developed under subdivision 1. A school safety plan may include a crisis management policy under section 121A.035. A school board must submit the plan to the School Safety Center for approval no later than May 1, 2028. The School Safety Center must review each plan and notify a school board whether the plan is approved as an evidence-based plan no later than August 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) A school safety plan must include a description of the school's efforts to create a positive school climate and support student mental health. new text end new text begin (c) A school board that does not submit a plan for review or that submits a plan that is not approved as evidence-based must notify parents, students, and staff no later than August 15, 2028, that the school board has not adopted an evidence-based school safety plan. The notice must: new text end new text begin (1) be written in plain language and be available to all parents and other school community members; new text end new text begin (2) identify the deadline for submitting the plan for review to the School Safety Center; new text end new text begin (3) state that the school board has not adopted an evidence-based school safety plan by the deadline; new text end new text begin (4) explain the purpose of an evidence-based school safety plan; and new text end new text begin (5) provide the name and contact information of the school employee designated to receive questions or concerns regarding school safety plans. new text end new text begin (d) A school board that has not adopted an evidence-based school safety plan by August 30, 2028, must adopt a school safety plan developed in partnership with the School Safety Center. The school board may amend the School Safety Center plan subject to approval by the School Safety Center. new text end new text begin (e) A nonpublic school is encouraged to develop an evidence-based school safety plan and consult with the School Safety Center on evidence-based approaches to improving school safety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [121A.0361] SCHOOL SAFETY ADVISORY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Council established. new text end new text begin (a) The School Safety Advisory Council is established as an advisory council to the School Safety Center at the Department of Public Safety. The advisory council consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) three students enrolled in grades 9 through 12; new text end new text begin (2) two persons under the age of 21 who are survivors of school or community violence; new text end new text begin (3) two parents of students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12; new text end new text begin (4) one licensed mental health professional not employed by the School Safety Center; and new text end new text begin (5) one employee of the School Safety Center. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety, in consultation with the commissioner of education, must appoint the members of the advisory council by September 1, 2026. The terms and compensation of the members are governed by section 15.059. The School Safety Advisory Council does not expire. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The School Safety Advisory Council must advise the School Safety Center on school safety needs and opportunities, including making recommendations to existing school safety approaches. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL SAFETY CENTER.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota School Safety Center. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $....... is to develop and distribute an evidence-based model school safety plan; new text end new text begin (2) $....... is to create a School Safety Advisory Council; and new text end new text begin (3) $....... is to assist schools in implementing customized school safety and student mental health plans. new text end